California statutes. Water Code
Notwithstanding Section 20527 or any other provision of law, in the Big Springs Irrigation District in Siskiyou County and in the Princeton-Codora-Glenn Irrigation District, every owner of real property within the district, but no others, may vote at elections for directors or otherwise. Owners need not be residents of the district in order to qualify as voters. The last equalized county assessment roll is conclusive evidence of ownership of the real property so owned. Where land is owned in joint tenancy, tenancy in common, or any other multiple ownership, the owners of the land shall designate in writing which one of the owners shall be deemed the owner of the land for purposes of qualifying as a voter.

The legal representative of a corporation or estate owning real property may vote on behalf of the corporation or estate. As used in this section, legal representative means an official of a corporation owning real property or a guardian, conservator, executor, or administrator of the estate of the holder of title to real property who is all of the following:

(a) Appointed under the laws of this state.

(b) Entitled to the possession of the estate’s real property.

(c) Authorized by the appointing court to exercise the particular right, privilege, or immunity which the legal representative seeks to exercise. Before a legal representative votes at a district election, the legal representative shall present to the precinct board a certified copy of his or her authority which shall be kept and filed with the returns of the election.

Every voter, or his or her legal representative, may vote at any district election either in person or by a person duly appointed as his or her proxy, but shall be entitled to cast only one vote. The appointment of a proxy shall be as provided in Section 35005.

Notwithstanding Section 21100 or any other provision of law, any voter, as defined in this section, is eligible to be a member of the Board of Directors of the Big Springs Irrigation District or the Board of Directors of the Princeton-Codora-Glenn Irrigation District.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 56, Sec. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

20527.10.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 20527 or any other provision of law, in the Glenn Colusa Irrigation District, every owner of real property within the district, but no others, may vote at district elections. Owners need not be residents of the district in order to qualify as voters.

(b) The last equalized district assessment roll is conclusive evidence of ownership of the real property.

(c) (1) If land is owned in joint tenancy, tenancy in common, or any other multiple ownership, the owners of the land shall designate, in writing, which one of the owners is deemed the owner of the land for purposes of qualifying as a voter.

(2) The designation shall be made upon a form provided by the district, and shall be filed with the district at least 40 days prior to the election and shall remain in effect until amended or revoked. No amendment or revocation may occur within the period of 39 days prior to any election.

(d) The district shall provide a list of eligible voters pursuant to Section 10525 of the Elections Code at least 35 days prior to an election, which list shall provide for the limitation of one vote for each owner as specified in this section.

(e) The legal representative of a corporation or estate owning real property may vote on behalf of the corporation or estate.

(f) (1) Every voter, or his or her legal representative, may vote at any district election either in person or by a person appointed as his or her proxy, but may cast only one vote.

(2) The Glenn Colusa Irrigation District has the powers of a California water district with regard to Section 35005 and the appointment of a proxy shall be pursuant to that section.

(g) Notwithstanding Section 21100 or any other provision of law, any voter, as specified in this section, may be a member of the Board of Directors of the Glenn Colusa Irrigation District as long as the voter is a landowner within the division that the voter represents, unless divisions are abolished as provided in Section 21550.

(h) (1) As used in this section, “legal representative” means an official of a corporation owning real property or a guardian, conservator, executor, or administrator of the estate of the holder of title to real property who is all of the following:

(A) Appointed under the laws of this state.

(B) Entitled to the possession of the estate’s real property.

(C) Authorized by the appointing court to exercise the particular right, privilege, or immunity which the legal representative seeks to exercise.

(2) Before a legal representative votes at a district election, the legal representative shall present to the precinct board a certified copy of his or her authority which shall be kept and filed with the returns of the election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 224.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

20527.11.

(a) The Board of Directors of the Richvale Irrigation District may adopt a resolution that authorizes persons holding title to real property within the district, or their legal representative, to vote. Holders of title need not be residents of the district in order to qualify as voters. Each eligible voter shall be entitled to cast only one vote.

(b) The last equalized county assessment roll is conclusive evidence of ownership of the real property.

(c) (1) If land is owned in joint tenancy, tenancy in common, community property, or any other multiple ownership, the owners of the land shall designate, in writing, which one of the owners is deemed the owner of the land for purposes of qualifying as a voter.

(2) The designation shall be made upon a form provided by the district, shall be filed with the district at least 40 days prior to the election, and shall remain in effect until amended or revoked. No amendment or revocation may occur within the period of 39 days prior to any election.

(d) The district shall provide to the elections clerk a list of eligible voters pursuant to Section 10525 of the Elections Code at least 35 days prior to an election.

(e) The legal representative of a corporation or estate owning real property may vote on behalf of the corporation or estate.

(f) (1) Every voter, or his or her legal representative, may vote at any district election either in person or by a person appointed as his or her proxy.

(2) Voting by legal representatives and the appointment of a proxy shall be allowed in accordance with Sections 35005 and 35006 of the Water Code.

(g) Notwithstanding Section 21100, any eligible voter, as specified in this section, may be a member of the Board of Directors of the Richvale Irrigation District.

(h) (1) As used in this section, “legal representative” means an official of a corporation owning real property or a guardian, conservator, executor, or administrator of the estate of the holder of title to real property who is all of the following:

(A) Appointed under the laws of this state.

(B) Entitled to the possession of the estate’s real property.

(C) Authorized by the appointing court to exercise the particular right, privilege, or immunity that the legal representative seeks to exercise.

(2) As used in this section, “eligible voter” means a person who meets the requirements of Section 20527 or a person who is a holder of title to real property within the district.

(3) The Board of Directors of the Richvale Irrigation District may, not less than 120 days before the next general district election, abolish the divisions of the district for that election. The abolishment of the divisions shall be effective only for that general election, unless the question of abolishing the divisions is presented to the voters at that election and a majority of the votes cast on that question are in favor of abolishing the divisions for future elections.

(i) (1) This section shall be operative as long as the district does not provide water, drainage services, electricity, flood control services, or sewage disposal services for domestic purposes for residents of the district.

(2) (A) This section shall become inoperative if the district commences to provide any of the services described in paragraph (1).

(B) The district shall notify the Secretary of State 30 days prior to commencing to provide any of the services described in paragraph (1). The notice required by this subparagraph shall state that it is being made pursuant to this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 681.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in subd. (i).)
-------------------------------------------

20527.12.

(a) (1) This section only applies to the James Irrigation District. As used in this section, “district” means the James Irrigation District.

(2) Notwithstanding Section 20527 or any other provision of law, in the district, every owner of real property within the district, but no others, may vote at district elections. Owners need not be residents of the district in order to qualify as voters.

(b) The last equalized district assessment roll is conclusive evidence of ownership of the real property.

(c) (1) If land is owned in joint tenancy, tenancy in common, or any other multiple ownership, the owners of the land shall designate, in writing, which one of the owners is deemed the owner of the land for purposes of qualifying as a voter.

(2) The designation shall be made upon a form provided by the district, and shall be filed with the district at least 40 days prior to the election and shall remain in effect until amended or revoked. No amendment or revocation may occur within the period of 39 days prior to any election.

(d) The district shall provide a list of eligible voters pursuant to Section 10525 of the Elections Code at least 35 days prior to an election, which list shall provide for the limitation of one vote for each owner as specified in this section.

(e) The legal representative of a corporation or estate owning real property may vote on behalf of the corporation or estate.

(f) (1) Every voter, or his or her legal representative, may vote at any district election either in person or by a person appointed as his or her proxy, but may cast only one vote.

(2) The district has the powers of a California water district with regard to Section 35005 and the appointment of a proxy shall be pursuant to that section.

(g) Notwithstanding Section 21100 or any other provision of law, any voter, as specified in this section, may be a member of the board of the district as long as the voter is a landowner within the division that the voter represents, unless divisions are abolished as provided in Section 21550.

(h) (1) As used in this section, “legal representative” means an official of a corporation owning real property or a guardian, conservator, executor, or administrator of the estate of the holder of title to real property who is all of the following:

(A) Appointed under the laws of this state.

(B) Entitled to the possession of the estate’s real property.

(C) Authorized by the appointing court to exercise the particular right, privilege, or immunity which the legal representative seeks to exercise.

(2) Before a legal representative votes at a district election, the legal representative shall present to the precinct board a certified copy of his or her authority which shall be kept and filed with the returns of the election.

(i) The board of the district, not less than 120 days before the general district election to be held in 2001, may abolish the divisions of the district for that election. The abolishment of the division shall be effective only for that general district election, unless the question of abolishing the division is presented to the voters at that election and a majority of the votes cast on that question are in favor of abolishing the divisions for future elections.

(j) (1) This section shall be operative as long as the district does not provide water, drainage services, electricity, flood control services, or sewage disposal services for domestic purposes for residents of the district.

(2) (A) This section shall become inoperative if the district commences to provide any of the services described in paragraph (1).

(B) The district shall notify the Secretary of State 30 days prior to commencing to provide any of the services described in paragraph (1). The notice required by this subparagraph shall state that it is being made pursuant to this subdivision.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1078, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

20527.13.

(a) (1) This section only applies to the Corcoran Irrigation District. As used in this section, “district” means the Corcoran Irrigation District.

(2) Notwithstanding Section 20527 or any other provision of law, in the district, every owner of real property within the district, but no others, may vote at district elections. Owners need not be residents of the district in order to qualify as voters.

(b) The last equalized district assessment roll is conclusive evidence of ownership of the real property.

(c) (1) If land is owned in joint tenancy, tenancy in common, or any other multiple ownership, the owners of the land shall designate, in writing, which one of the owners is deemed the owner of the land for purposes of qualifying as a voter.

(2) The designation shall be made upon a form provided by the district, and shall be filed with the district at least 40 days prior to the election and shall remain in effect until amended or revoked. No amendment or revocation may occur within the period of 39 days prior to any election.

(d) The district shall provide a list of eligible voters pursuant to Section 10525 of the Elections Code at least 35 days prior to an election, which list shall provide for the limitation of one vote for each owner as specified in this section.

(e) The legal representative of a corporation or estate owning real property may vote on behalf of the corporation or estate.

(f) (1) Every voter, or his or her legal representative, may vote at any district election either in person or by a person appointed as his or her proxy, but may cast only one vote.

(2) Proxies shall be appointed pursuant to Section 35005.

(g) (1) Notwithstanding Section 21100 or any other provision of law, any voter or a voter’s legal representative, as defined in this section, may be a member of the board of the district as long as the voter is a landowner within the division that the voter represents, unless the divisions have been abolished, as provided in Section 21550, and the voter resides within the boundaries of the district or the City of Corcoran.

(2) The requirements of this subdivision apply to any board member who is elected, or appointed to fill a vacancy, on or after the effective date of the act adding this subdivision.

(h) (1) As used in this section, “legal representative” means an official of a corporation owning real property or a guardian, conservator, executor, or administrator of the estate of the holder of title to real property who is all of the following:

(A) Appointed under the laws of this state.

(B) Entitled to the possession of the estate’s real property.

(C) Authorized by the appointing court to exercise the particular right, privilege, or immunity which the legal representative seeks to exercise.

(2) Before a legal representative votes at a district election, the legal representative shall present to the precinct board a certified copy of his or her authority which shall be kept and filed with the returns of the election.

(i) (1) This section shall be operative as long as the district does not provide water, drainage services, electricity, flood control services, or sewage disposal services for domestic purposes for residents of the district.

(2) (A) This section shall become inoperative if the district commences to provide any of the services described in paragraph (1).

(B) The district shall notify the Secretary of State 30 days prior to commencing to provide any of the services described in paragraph (1). The notice required by this subparagraph shall state that it is being made pursuant to this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 606, Sec. 9.   Effective October 9, 2001.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in subd. (i).)
-------------------------------------------

20528.

“Holder of title” includes a holder of evidence of title and, also, a holder of land under a possessory right acquired by entry or purchase from the United States or the State of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

20529.

“Property” except in Part 10 embraces all real and personal property, including water, water rights, works, franchises, concessions and rights.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

20530.

“Works” includes dams, reservoirs, wells, conduits, pumps, power houses, power generating equipment, power lines, and their appurtenances.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

20531.

“Conduits” include canals, laterals, ditches, flumes, pipes, and their appurtenances.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

20532.

“Acquire” includes construct, purchase, lease, exchange, condemn, jointly acquire when joint acquisition is permitted, and contract to acquire.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

20533.

“Dispose” includes lease, sell, contract to lease, contract to sell, and the making of any instrument necessary therefor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

20534.

“Operate” includes use, maintain, and repair.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

20535.

“Assessee” means the person to whom property is assessed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

20536.

“Assessment book” includes any substantial record showing the information required to be kept in it, whether in the form of bound volumes or of cards arranged and kept to provide a record of the assessments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

20537.

“Completion assessment” means an assessment levied pursuant to Article 2 of Chapter 2 of Part 10.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

20538.

“Particular purpose assessment” means an assessment levied pursuant to Article 3 of Chapter 2 of Part 10.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

20539.

“Emergency assessment” means an assessment levied pursuant to Article 4 of Chapter 2 of Part 10.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

20540.

“Limited assessments” means any or all of the following:

(a) Completion assessment.

(b) Particular purpose assessment.

(c) Emergency assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

20541.

“Charges” includes tolls.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

20542.

“Refund” includes fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

20543.

“Road” includes streets, highways, and alleys.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. General Provisions [20560. - 20573.]

20560.

Districts, regardless of the date of formation, are subject to the provisions of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

20560.2.

In the case of any district that owns and operates facilities for the generation, transmission, distribution, and retail sale of electric power, the district shall give notice to the California Debt and Investment Advisory Commission, at least 30 days prior to the proposed sale date, of the proposed sale of any evidence of indebtedness issued to provide financing of any works of the district. The notice shall include the information required by subdivision (i) of Section 8855 of the Government Code. Failure to give this notice shall render the sale invalid. The California Debt and Investment Advisory Commission may waive the 30-day notice period upon application by the district.

In carrying out the purpose of this section,
 the California Debt and Investment Advisory Commission may charge fees payable solely from the proceeds of the sale of the debt issue in an amount equal to one-fortieth of 1 percent of the principal amount of the issue, but not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) for any one issue.

The bonds shall be legal investments for all trust funds, for the funds of all insurance companies, commercial banks, savings banks, trust companies, the state school funds, and for any funds which may be invested in bonds of cities, cities and counties, counties, school districts, or municipalities in the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 556.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

20561.

Nothing in this division impairs the validity of any district formed prior to the effective date of this division, its rights, or obligations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

20562.

Whenever by this division a notice is required to be published for a designated number of weeks or once a week for a designated number of weeks, the notice need be published on only one day of each week and for only the same number of times as the number of weeks designated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

20563.

Whenever any act is required to be done or proceeding taken on the first Tuesday in any month, the act may be done or proceeding had upon the day of the month otherwise specified for the regular meeting of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

20564.

Whenever an instrument provided for in this division is acknowledged or proved, it shall have the same effect as evidence as a conveyance of real property which has been acknowledged and in case of any petition under this division is evidence of the fact of place of residence of a petitioner as stated by him on the petition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

20565.

Whenever an instrument is by this division required to be acknowledged, each signer shall acknowledge the instrument, or his signature shall be proved, in the manner provided by law before his signature shall be effective.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

20566.

A guardian, conservator, executor, administrator, or other person holding property in a trust capacity under appointment of court may sign any petition provided for in this division, when authorized by an order of court, which order may be made without notice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 730.)
-------------------------------------------

20566.1.

A district with respect to land owned by it may through its board sign any petition provided for in this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 749.)
-------------------------------------------

20567.

If any land is assessed on any assessment book to unknown or fictitiously named owners, or to unnamed owners in addition to any owner or owners named thereon, the land has, for the purposes of any petition provided for in this division, but one owner in addition to any owner or owners whose true name or names may be purported to be given on the assessment book.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

20568.

The holder of title to an undivided interest in any land may sign any petition provided for in this division. Undivided interests shall be counted and valued as though they were separate interests. If the assessment book fails to indicate the extent of any undivided interest, the holders of title whose undivided interests in any land are not specifically defined have, for the purposes of this division, equal shares therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

20568.1.

No person may sign for the owner of property or the owner of an undivided interest therein without the authorization of the owner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1083.)
-------------------------------------------

20569.

The value of any land and the holders of title to the land are conclusively determined, for the purpose of any petition provided for in this division, by the district assessment book last equalized at the time of the presentation of the petition.

When no assessment book of the district has been equalized, the county assessment roll of the county in which the land is situated last equalized at the time of the presentation of the petition is conclusive evidence of the value and title.

However, for the purposes of a petition to form a district and so far as land outside a district is concerned for the purposes of a petition to form an improvement district under Chapter 2A of Part 7 the county assessment roll of the county in which the land is situated, last equalized at the time of the first publication of the petition is conclusive evidence of the value and title.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1947, Ch. 816.)
-------------------------------------------

20570.

It is reaffirmed that districts are state agencies formed and existing for governmental purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 1366.)
-------------------------------------------

20571.

Assessments of a district, for whatsoever purpose, levied on all assessable land at a like rate on the basis of the assessed valuation of the land are hereby declared to be charges for the services furnished by the district and not a capital investment of the landowners.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 187.)
-------------------------------------------

20573.

Districts governed by this division are subject to the provisions of the Uniform District Election Law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. State Public Land [20590. - 20594.]

20590.

As used in this chapter “public land” is limited to land belonging to the State which is subject to entry or has been entered and for which no certificate of purchase has been issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

20591.

Public land is subject to all of the provisions of law relating to districts to the same extent and in the same manner as land in private ownership.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

20592.

When public land is affected, all notices required by this division shall promptly after issuance be served upon the State Lands Commission by mailing to its office a copy inclosed in a sealed envelope with postage prepaid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

20593.

Nothing in this chapter creates any obligation against the State to pay any assessments or charges.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

20594.

No public land which was unentered at the time any assessment was levied against it by any district shall be sold for the delinquency of the assessment, but the assessment shall be and continue a lien upon the land, and no patent shall be issued therefor until the applicant presents a certificate from the collector stating that no unpaid assessments or charges are delinquent upon it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Information by Department [20625. - 20627.]

20625.

The department shall give information so far as it may be practicable to persons contemplating the formation of districts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

20626.

Whenever the department deems it in the public interest that preliminary surveys and field investigations of a proposed district project should be made at the expense of the State, the department shall make the surveys and field investigations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

20627.

Pending the completion of the preliminary surveys and field investigations, the State Water Resources Control Board may withhold from appropriation any unappropriated water likely to be needed by the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2. FORMATION [20700. - 20982.]



  CHAPTER 1. Petition for Formation [20700. - 20742.]



  ARTICLE 1. Petitioners and Land [20700. - 20702.]

20700.

A majority in number of the holders of title to land susceptible of irrigation from a common source and by the same system of works, including pumping from subsurface or other water, who are also the holders of title to a majority in value of the land may propose the formation of a district under the provisions of this division; or the formation of the district may be proposed by not less than 500 petitioners, each of whom is an elector residing in the proposed district or the holder of title to land therein and which petitioners include the holders of title to not less than 20 per cent in value of the land included within the proposed district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

20701.

The land proposed to be formed into a district need not consist of contiguous parcels.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

20702.

“Land susceptible of irrigation” as used in section 20700 of this code includes land used for residential or business purposes susceptible of receiving water for domestic or agriculture purposes and if land of that character constitutes a majority in area of the land in the proposed district the holders of title thereto or electors residing thereon shall be counted as qualified petitioners for the formation of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 499.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Petition [20720. - 20724.]

20720.

A petition for the formation of a district shall contain:

(a) Generally, a description of the land.

(b) Generally, the sources, which may be in the alternative, from which the land is proposed to be irrigated.

(c) The name of a person to whom notice of the final hearing on the petition may be sent.

(d) A prayer that the land described be formed into a district.

(e) Signatures of the petitioners.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

20721.

A petition for the formation of a district may request any of the following:

(a) Three divisions in the proposed district.

(b) Election of the directors of the proposed district by the district at large.

(c) Consolidation of any offices allowed to be consolidated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

20722.

The petition may consist of any number of separate instruments, which shall be duplicates except as to signatures.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

20723.

The petition shall be accompanied by a sufficient undertaking, to be approved by the board of supervisors, in double the amount of the probable cost of forming the district, conditioned that the sureties shall pay all of the costs in case the formation is not effected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

20724.

Signatures to the petition may be withdrawn at any time before its publication is commenced, by filing a declaration, signed and acknowledged by the petitioner, with the board of supervisors of the principal county, stating that it is the intention of the petitioner to withdraw therefrom.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Publication [20740. - 20742.]

20740.

The petition and a notice of the time of the meeting at which it will be presented shall be published for at least two weeks before the time at which it is to be presented. Publication shall be in a newspaper of general circulation printed and published in the principal county and in a newspaper published in each other affected county. The notice shall be signed by the county elections official of the principal county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 152.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

20741.

When the petition consists of a number of separate instruments, only one need be published, but the names attached to all of the instruments shall appear in the publication.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

20742.

No defect in the form or contents of the published notice, title to it, or petition, nor failure to publish or error in publishing any signature to the petition shall vitiate the proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Hearings on Formation [20800. - 20850.]



  ARTICLE 1. Preliminary Hearing [20800. - 20806.]

20800.

The formation petition shall be presented to the board of supervisors of the principal county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

20801.

The petition shall be presented at a regular meeting of the board of supervisors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

20802.

The board of supervisors shall hear all competent and relevant testimony offered in support of or in opposition to the sufficiency of the petition and the publication of the notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

20803.

The hearing may be adjourned from time to time, but not exceeding two weeks in all.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

20804.

At the hearing the board of supervisors shall determine by resolution whether or not the petition and notice comply with Chapter 1 of this part. Notwithstanding Section 22116 or any other provision of law, the board shall also determine whether the petition has been presented and the district is proposed to be formed for the primary purpose of providing irrigation services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1042, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

20805.

(a) If the board of supervisors determines that any of the requirements for the formation petition or notice were not complied with, the petition shall be dismissed without prejudice to the right of the proper number of persons to present a new petition covering the same matter or to present the same petition with additional signatures if additional signatures are necessary to comply with the requirements of Chapter 1 of this part.

(b) If the board of supervisors determines that the district is being formed for a primary purpose other than providing irrigation services, the petition shall be dismissed without prejudice to the right of the proper number of persons to present a new petition for the primary purpose of providing irrigation services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1042, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

20806.

If the board of supervisors determines that the requirements for the formation petition and notice have been complied with, the resolution so determining shall be known as the preliminary formation resolution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Reference to Department [20820. - 20824.]

20820.

On or before the day on which the petition is presented to the board of supervisors, a copy of the petition shall be filed in the office of the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

20821.

Upon the adoption of the preliminary formation resolution the board of supervisors shall send a copy of the resolution to the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

20822.

Upon receiving a copy of the resolution, the department shall make such preliminary investigation as may be practicable to determine the feasibility of the proposed project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

20823.

The department shall report in writing to the board of supervisors as soon as practicable, but at all events within 90 days from the date of the adoption of the preliminary formation resolution, except that upon receiving a written request from the department the board of supervisors may before the expiration of the 90 days grant to the department not more than 90 days additional time in which to make the report.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

20824.

If the department reports within the specified time that the supply of water available for the use of the proposed district or that may be acquired by any practicable means, including the condemnation of existing rights, is not sufficient or that the project is not feasible for any other reason, the hearing of the petition shall be continued for not more than two months and shall then be dismissed unless within the period of the continuance either:

(a) The board of supervisors is petitioned in writing by three-fourths of the holders of title to land to grant the petition.

(b) The board of supervisors, if not so petitioned, modifies the project proposed in the petition to conform to the recommendations made by the department for the proposed district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Final Hearing [20840. - 20850.]

20840.

The board of supervisors not later than its first regular meeting after the occurrence of any one of the following shall set a time for the final hearing of the formation petition:

(a) Receipt of a favorable report from the department.

(b) Modification of the project by the board to conform to the recommendations made by the department.

(c) Receipt of the requisite petition after an adverse report by the department.

(d) Expiration of the time allowed for the making of a report by the department when the report has not been received within the time allowed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

20841.

The time set for the final hearing shall not be less than one week from the meeting at which the time is set.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

20842.

Notice of the time of the final hearing shall be given either by:

(a) Registered mail to the person designated for that purpose in the petition. 

(b) Publication for at least three days in one daily newspaper published in the principal county.
